src/negations/negations.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Neg +Adv +Pron +Det +Mas +Fem

LEXICON Root
ne+Neg:ne	#;
ne+Neg:n'	#;

pas+Neg+Adv:pas	#;
!pas% du% tout+Neg+Adv:pas% du% tout	#;
jamais+Neg+Adv:jamais	#;
!nulle% part+Neg+Adv:nulle% part	#;
guère+Neg+Adv:guère	#;
point+Neg+Adv:point	#;
aucunement+Neg+Adv:aucunement	#;
nullement+Neg+Adv:nullement	#;

rien+Neg+Pron:rien	#;
personne+Neg+Pron:personne	#;

aucun+Neg+Det+Mas:aucun	#;
aucun+Neg+Det+Fem:aucune	#;
